California, session 20252026, AB2457.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1374.198 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:1374.198. (a)Except as provided in Section 1374.197, within one year of the operative date of this section, a health care service plan plan, including a Medi-Cal managed care plan, or its delegate that credentials health care providers for its networks shall make a determination regarding the credentials of a health care provider within 90 days after receiving a completed provider credentialing application, including all required third-party verifications. Upon receipt of the application by the credentialing department, the health care service plan or its delegate shall notify the applicant within 10 business days to verify receipt and inform the applicant whether the application is complete. The health care service plan shall activate the provider upon successful approval and notify the applicant of the activation within 10 days of approval if the approval occurs prior to the end of the 90-day timeline. The 90-day timeline shall apply only to the credentialing process and does not include contracting completion. If the health care service plan or its delegate does not meet the 90-day requirement, the applicant’s credentials shall be provisionally approved for 120 days unless any of the following apply:(1)(a) The applicant is subject to discipline by the licensing entity for that applicant.(2)(b) The applicant has one or more adverse action reports or one or more reports of malpractice payments filed with the National Practitioner Data Bank.(3)(c) The applicant has not been credentialed by the health care service plan in the past five years.(b)This section does not apply to contracts with the State Department of Health Care Services pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of Welfare and Institutions Code.SEC. 2. Section 1380.2 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:1380.2. (a) (1)Notwithstanding any other law, except as provided in Section 1374.197, on and after January 1, 2028, a full service health care service plan plan, including a Medi-Cal managed care plan, or its delegate shall subscribe to and use the most recent version of the Council for Affordable Quality Healthcare (CAQH) credentialing form, and shall comply with the CAQH credentialing processes.(2)(b) A full service health care service plan or its delegate shall only request additional information from a provider to clarify and confirm information that is provided on the CAQH credentialing form, including verification of information not specifically disclosed on the provider’s application. The provider shall respond to the request within 10 business days. A health care service plan or its delegate shall minimize the number of requests for additional information from providers. A provider shall submit their credentialing form and maintain their credentialing information in the CAQH database in a manner consistent with CAQH standards.(b)This section does not apply to contracts with the State Department of Health Care Services pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.